Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-237
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices Act, the definitions found in sections 86-238 to 86-243 apply.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1201;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 99.